Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202616-1041
Benefits under prior law, how construed.

Nothing in the Cities of the First Class Firefighters Retirement Act shall in any manner affect the right of any person now receiving or entitled to receive, now or in the future, pension or other benefits provided for in sections 35-201 to 35-216, as they exist immediately prior to January 1, 1984, to receive such pension or other benefits in all respects the same as if such sections remained in full force and effect.

Laws 1983, LB 531, § 22;

Laws 1985, LB 6, § 1;

Laws 2024, LB686, § 12.